Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 14 Legislative Oversight Commission

22-14-1.
Establishment — Purpose — Membership — Compensation.

There is established an oversight commission empowered to conduct evaluations and reviews of statutes, statutory entities, and associated rules and regulations. The review or evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the following as its objectives:

The elimination of inactive entities or statutes;

The elimination of entities or statutes that duplicate other entities or statutes or other governmental programs and activities or determination of an appropriate consolidation for the duplicate entities, statutes, or governmental programs and activities;

The elimination or modification of inefficient, unnecessary, or ineffective entities or statutes; and

The determination of the impact of rules and regulations promulgated by any entity.

The commission shall consist of fourteen (14) members all of whom shall be citizens and residents of this state; four (4) of whom shall be members of the house of representatives, not more than three (3) from the same political party, to be appointed by the speaker; three (3) of whom shall be members of the senate, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be the director of administration; four (4) of whom shall be members of the general public to be appointed by the governor; one of whom shall be the fiscal assistant to the house finance committee; and one of whom shall be the auditor general.

The public members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years except for the two (2) members originally appointed; one shall be appointed for a term of one year and one shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years.

The legislative members shall serve a term of two (2) years. The members shall annually elect one of them as chairperson of the commission.

Any vacancy on the commission, occurring for any reason prior to the expiration of the term, including, but not limited to, termination of active membership in the general assembly, shall be filled for the unexpired term by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment.

Any member of the commission may, for cause, be summarily removed from office by the appointing authority, which removal shall be subject to judicial review by the superior court, and pending that review the member shall not carry out any duties as a commission member.

The director of administration, the fiscal assistant to the house finance committee, and the auditor general respectively may designate a person to represent them at all commission meetings.

The members of the commission, except those members from the general public, shall receive no salaries but shall be allowed reasonable expenses in the performance of their official duties.

The members from the general public shall not be compensated for service on the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

42-67-1

; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 21; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 34; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 20.

22-14-2.
Quorum — Meetings.

Six (6) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. Meetings of the commission may be held at any time or place upon call of any member, after a reasonable notice by mail to the other members, and shall be held at the times and places as in the judgment of the commission will best serve the convenience of all parties in interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-2; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 74.

22-14-3.
Rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations in compliance with the open meetings law governing its operations and procedure to carry out the purposes of this chapter. These rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to, public hearings to determine whether or not the existence of any entity due to expire in that year should be continued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-3; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1.

22-14-4.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Statutory entity” or “entity” means any committee, board, commission, or “subdivision of state government” created and continued in existence for the purpose of administering a statute or legislative resolution. Cities and towns and agencies and instrumentalities of cities and towns are exempted from this definition.

“Termination date” means the date provided for termination of legislative authority for the existence of a particular entity or statute.

“Zero-base budget review and evaluation” means, with respect to a statutory entity, a comprehensive evaluation to determine if the merits of the activities of the entity support its continuation, and a recommended budget level for the entity, based upon a justification by that entity of its budget from a zero base.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-4; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 26.

22-14-5.
Repealed.

22-14-5.1.
Repealed.

22-14-5.2.
Repealed.

22-14-5.3.
Entities without expiration date — Statutory construction.

For the purpose of construing this chapter in determining the expiration date of any statutory entity, the lack of a specific date for expiration of an entity shall mean that it is the intent of the general assembly to continue the entity in existence until the general assembly by specific legislation ends the statutory existence of the entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 253, § 3.

22-14-5.4.
Repealed.

22-14-6.
Procedure for re-creation.

The procedure for re-creation of any statute or statutory entity to be terminated under the provisions of this chapter shall be established by the commission. Those procedures shall include a zero-base budget review and evaluation by the auditor general as well as any other procedures which the commission determines are necessary to meet its objectives.

Each entity shall be notified of its termination date, and that a review by the auditor general will begin. The entity shall also be notified of all other procedures with which it will be expected to comply.

Upon completion of the zero-based budget review and evaluation the office of auditor general shall transmit its report to the commission. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

An identification of other entities, or other programs or activities of the state government, having the same or similar objectives, along with a comparison of the cost and effectiveness of those entities, programs, or activities and any duplication of the entity under review;

An examination of the extent to which the objectives of the entity under review have been achieved when compared to the objectives initially set forth for the entity under review and an analysis of any significant variance between projected and actual performance; and

A statement of the objectives of the entity for the coming four (4) years with the establishment of measurements of performance where feasible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-6; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1.

22-14-7.
Commission report.

The commission shall adopt and make public regulations and guidelines for determining the continued public need for such governmental bodies. The regulations and guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, the following criteria:

Would the termination of the entity or statute significantly harm or endanger the public health, safety, or welfare?

Has the entity met the objectives of the statute that created it?

Has the entity or statute encouraged participation by the public?

Do the functions of the entity or statute overlap or duplicate the functions of any other entity or statute?

What are the objectives of the entity or statute for the next five (5) years?

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1: G.L. 1956, § 42-67-7; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 414, § 18.

22-14-8.
Activities by terminated statutory entity.

Each entity may continue itself in existence for up to one year after scheduled termination for the purpose of completing its work and activities. During this completion period, termination shall not reduce or otherwise limit the powers or authority of each entity. Upon the expiration of one year after termination, each entity shall cease. All unexpended balances of appropriations or other funds shall revert to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-8; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1.

22-14-9.
Repealed.

22-14-10.
Proceedings against statutory entity.

Nothing in this chapter shall cause any right, claim, or cause of action held by any person against any entity to be dismissed, nor shall any right, claim, or cause of action held by any entity which has been terminated pursuant to this chapter lapse because of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-10; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 391, § 1.

22-14-11.
Legislative action.

Whenever the general assembly is about to create or re-create any statutory entity it should, whenever possible, request a report from the commission as set forth in §

22-14-7

; however, no report is required to be received by the general assembly for any action to be taken, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the legislature from terminating an entity covered by these provisions at a date earlier than that provided in this chapter, nor to prohibit the legislature from considering any other legislation relative to that entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-11; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 74.

22-14-12.
Retirement systems unaffected.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to retirement systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-12; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1.

22-14-13.
State bonds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, no entity which has outstanding bonds shall be abolished until and unless provision is made for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds at or before maturity or for the assumption of the indebtedness by the state or any agency or subdivision of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1: G.L. 1956, § 42-67-13; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1.

22-14-14.
Severability.

If any provisions or item of this chapter or the application of it is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 260, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-67-14; P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1.